Massachusetts, session 194th, H4026.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 127 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 127 and
inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 127. The governor, upon the written recommendation of the commissioner or the
chairman of the parole board, may convey upon field parole officers and correctional officers of
the investigative and fugitive apprehension units of the department of correction the authority
prescribed in this section for a term of 3 years, unless sooner removed.
Upon written application and recommendation, the commissioner of the department of
correction and executive director of the parole board shall certify in writing, each full-time
employee recommended for appointment under this section has, (1) demonstrated exemplary
personal conduct as well as competent professional conduct and be free from any disciplinary
action, excluding discipline related to administrative job performance except that which
contradicts and jeopardizes the public trust, within the previous 3 years; (2) if, at any time during
of 3

the 3 years, the commissioner or executive director shall notify the governor of any conduct,
personal, professional or otherwise , that jeopardizes the public trust and may be grounds for
revocation of appointment; (3) must be duly licensed to carry a firearm, at all times; if, for any
reason the license to carry is suspended, revoked, or not renewed for any reason authority under
this section is automatically revoked; (4) complete yearly certification in firearms, use of force,
and de-escalation; (5) field parole officers appointed under this section must complete a
minimum of 24 hours of annual training in topics related to: behavioral health disorders,
substance use disorders, effective treatment responses and intentions, case management
practices, motivational interviewing, reentry or social determinants of health.
Officers so appointed may serve detainers issued by the parole board, orders of removal
or transfer of prisoners issued by the commissioner, apprehend and take custody of a person
escaping or attempting to escape from a correctional facility, any place where a parole board
hearing is being held, from the custody of an officer, or while being conveyed to and from any
court or penal institution. Such special state officers of the parole board may also perform police
duties: (1) when arresting parolees pursuant to warrants or detainers of the parole board or
transporting said parolees, over individuals who attempt or threaten to interfere with such special
state police officers of the parole board in the performance of their duties; or (2) on the premises
of parole board facilities, which facilities shall include locations where the board is conducting a
hearing or other board business;.
During the course of an investigation of parole violations, and upon such parole officer
reasonably believes that evidence of a parole violation is concealed on such parolee's person or
under such parolee's exclusive control, a person appointed under this section shall contact the
of 3

appropriate local police department, or state police, who then shall apply for and execute said
search warrant.
Parole officers appointed under this section shall only be present, participate or
accompany law enforcement unless the warrant or investigation directly involves individuals
supervised by the parole board.
Whenever evidence of a crime has been discovered by such special state officer, the
appropriate local police department or state police shall be notified immediately.
A person appointed under this section from the investigative and fugitive apprehension
unit of the department of correction: (1) may in the presence of a police officer serve warrants
issued by any court or trial justice in the commonwealth for the arrest of a person charged with
the crime of escape or attempt to escape from a department of correction facility or from the
custody of an officer of the department of correction while being conveyed to or from any such
institution, and may perform police duty about the premises of penal institutions; (2) when
arresting escapees pursuant to arrest warrants or transporting said escapees, over individuals who
attempt or threaten to interfere with such special state police officers of said investigative and
fugitive apprehension unit in the performance of their duties, (3) shall only be present, participate
or accompany law enforcement unless the warrant or investigation is directly related to the
responsibilities of these units.
Except for the authority contained within this chapter and section, a person so appointed
under this section shall have no other law enforcement authority.
of 3